South Dakota, session 2026, HB1019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 38-20A-13 be AMENDED:
38-20A-13. The secretary may cancel the registration of a pesticide, subject to a
hearing under the provisions of chapter 1-26, if the secretary determines that the
registered pesticide or its labeling:
(1) Does not comply with the provisions of this chapter or rules promulgated under
this chapter; or
(2) Is adulterated or misbranded.

26.383.11 2 1019
An Act to revise provisions regarding pesticide laws.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1019
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1019 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1019 ENROLLED